Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 8 Public Buildings

37-8-1.
State house — State office building.

The department of administration shall have control and supervision of the state house and the state office building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 104; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-1

; P.L. 2004, ch. 125, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 362, § 2.

37-8-1.1.
Washington county courthouse in West Kingston.

The director of the department of administration is hereby authorized and empowered to convey or lease for a term of one hundred (100) years the existing Washington county courthouse in West Kingston to the South County center for the arts upon the completion of a new courthouse. The sale or lease shall be for the sum of one dollar ($1.00).

The association shall be responsible for all costs associated with the conveyance or lease to include maintenance, repair, and upkeep.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 516, § 1.

37-8-1.2.
Vacating by family court — Westerly townhall.

When the family court vacates that portion of the Westerly town hall premises which it now owns and occupies, the director of the department of administration is hereby authorized and empowered to convey the state’s entire interest in the premises to the town of Westerly. The consideration for the sale shall be one dollar ($1.00). The town of Westerly shall be responsible for all costs associated with the conveyance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 2, § 1.

37-8-1.3.
Woonsocket courthouse.

The director of the department of administration is hereby authorized and empowered to convey the courthouse in Woonsocket formerly used by the seventh division of the district court to the city of Woonsocket. The consideration for the sale shall be one dollar ($1.00). The city of Woonsocket shall be responsible for all costs associated with the conveyance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 155, § 1.

37-8-1.4.
Kent County Courthouse at East Greenwich.

The State of Rhode Island has determined that it no longer needs the property and building thereon which once served the people as the Kent County Courthouse. The Town of East Greenwich has determined that it can use the property and building thereon for municipal purposes. Therefore, the director of the department of administration is hereby authorized and empowered to convey the state’s interest in the real property, the buildings thereon, and fixtures, located in the Town of East Greenwich and commonly known as the “Kent County Courthouse” to the town of East Greenwich. The consideration for the sale shall be one dollar ($1.00) paid by the Town of East Greenwich to the State. The transfer of the Kent County Courthouse shall be contingent upon the Town’s receiving authority for issuing bonds or notes in order to finance the construction, renovation, equipping, furnishing, or additions to the Kent County Courthouse from both the general assembly and the electors of the Town and the Town’s actually receiving the proceeds of the bonds or notes. The State hereby agrees to indemnify the Town of East Greenwich for environmental liabilities which existed at the Kent County Courthouse prior to the date of transfer. The Town of East Greenwich shall be responsible for all costs associated with the conveyance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 330, § 1.

37-8-1.5.
Bristol County Courthouse.

The state of Rhode Island has determined that it no longer needs the property and building thereon which once served the people as the Bristol County Courthouse and as a state house. Therefore, the director of the department of administration is hereby authorized and empowered to convey the state’s interest in the real property, the buildings thereon, and fixtures, located in the Town of Bristol and commonly known as the “Bristol County Courthouse” to the Bristol Statehouse Foundation, a Rhode Island non-business corporation. The consideration for the sale shall be one dollar ($1.00) paid by the Bristol Statehouse Foundation to the state. The deed conveying the property shall contain covenants relating to the preservation thereof and a reverter in the event the Bristol Statehouse Foundation, or legal successor thereto, ceases to exist.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 7, § 1.

37-8-1.6.
Pawtucket armory.

The state of Rhode Island has determined that it no longer needs the property and buildings which once served the people as the Pawtucket armory. The city of Pawtucket has determined that it can use the property and buildings for municipal purposes. Therefore, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the director of the department of administration is hereby authorized and empowered to convey the state’s entire interest in the Pawtucket armory to the city of Pawtucket. The consideration for the sale is one dollar ($1.00). The city of Pawtucket is responsible for all costs associated with the conveyance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 257, § 1.

37-8-2.
Rented premises — Military buildings — Institutional buildings.

The department and the director of administration shall also have supervision of the various military buildings in the custody of the adjutant general; provided, however, that the supervision shall relate only to the construction, repair, maintenance, and janitorial service of the properties. The department shall also have the supervision of the various buildings at the Dr. U. E. Zambarano memorial hospital, the Rhode Island school for the deaf, the several barracks under the control of the state police, buildings under the supervision of the chief engineer of the public works division of the department of transportation, and buildings and structures under the department of environmental management; provided, however, that the supervision shall relate only to the construction and repair of the properties, and shall not relate to the repair of buildings at the Dr. U. E. Zambarano memorial hospital.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 105; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1955, ch. 3453, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-2

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 125, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 362, § 2.

37-8-3.
Duty of department to maintain buildings.

The department of administration shall care for and maintain in suitable condition for use by the occupants of the state house and by the public all of the property placed in the custody of the department of administration by the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 1051, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 37, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 35, § 3; P.L. 1927, ch. 953, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 105, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 104, 105; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-3

.

37-8-4.
Employees of department — Purchase of supplies and services.

The director of administration shall select and engage all of the employees in his or her judgment necessary therefor, fix their compensation, and discharge them at his or her pleasure, and shall cause to be purchased all materials, supplies, and tools necessary for the care and maintenance, including gas, water, electric lights, and power, and electric clock, and local telephone service, to be paid for out of the appropriation that shall be made by the general assembly from time to time for those purposes upon vouchers approved by the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 1051, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 37, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 35, § 3; P.L. 1927, ch. 953, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 105, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-4

.

37-8-5.
Care and custody of State House lot.

The State House lot, bounded by Smith, Francis, and Gaspee Streets, in the city of Providence, and the buildings thereon, together with all the paintings, portraits, furniture, furnishings, fittings, fixtures, apparatus, and property of all descriptions belonging to the state contained in the buildings, excepting the books of account, records, and papers of the different departments and offices, shall be in the care and custody of the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 1051, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 37, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 35, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 105, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-5

.

37-8-5.1.
Prohibition of parking on North Terrace of the State House.

No vehicle shall be parked on the terrace of the State House lot located on Smith Street designated as the “North Terrace”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 434, § 1.

37-8-6.
“State House” defined — Former state houses — Use of legislative chambers.

Wherever in the statutes of this state the words “State House” are used they shall be construed to mean the building upon the lot bounded by Gaspee, Francis, and Smith Streets in the city of Providence. The building in the city of Newport heretofore used for the purpose of a “state house” shall hereafter be called the Newport County courthouse. The building in Providence heretofore used for the purpose of a “state house” shall hereafter be called the sixth judicial district courthouse. The senate chamber and representatives hall of the State House shall not be used for any other purpose than for meetings of the two houses of the general assembly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1901, ch. 852, § 4; P.L. 1905, ch. 1228, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 1918, ch. 1627, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 1925, ch. 625, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 105, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-6

.

37-8-6.1.
Korean War monument.

The director of the department of administration shall establish and cause to be displayed in the State House a monument commemorating the men and women who served in the armed forces of the United States during the Korean War.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 427, § 1.

37-8-6.2.
State House restoration and preservation account.

There is hereby created within the general fund a restricted receipts account known as the State House restoration and preservation account. The purpose of the account shall be to accept donations from the State House restoration society, which shall be used exclusively for the restoration, preservation, betterment, and benefit of the Rhode Island State House located on Smith Street in Providence, Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 80, § 1.

37-8-6.3.
Painting of state seals.

The thirteen (13) state seals displayed above the senate chamber shall be painted with the authentic colors as officially adopted by the state which they represent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 302, § 1.

37-8-6.4.
POW/MIA chair of honor.

The director of the department of administration shall establish and cause to be displayed in the State House a POW/MIA chair of honor commemorating the men and women of the United States armed forces taken as prisoners of war or listed as missing in action.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 172, § 1.

37-8-7.
Allotment of office space in State House — Furnishings.

The director of administration shall designate the rooms to be used by the committees, boards, departments, divisions, commissions, officers, or persons now or hereafter authorized by law to be provided with offices in the state house, and shall furnish the offices, to the extent of furnishings in the custody of the department of administration available therefor. Upon the request of any board, department, division, commission, or officer, the department of administration shall from time to time, as in the director’s judgment may be necessary, repair and renew the furniture, furnishings, and other movables used or to be used in any office, and the cost of repair and renewal of the furniture, furnishings, and other movables or any additions thereto shall be paid upon vouchers approved by the director of administration from the appropriation made to be expended for that purpose. All furniture, furnishings, and movables shall remain in the care and custody of the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 1051, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 37, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 35, § 3; P.L. 1927, ch. 953, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 105, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-7

.

37-8-8.
Battle flags and markers.

The priceless battle flags and markers now belonging to the state of Rhode Island, and any that may hereafter be presented to this state, shall be maintained by the department of administration in embellished cases suitable for their display in the halls or foyers of the State House, and the cases shall be practically hermetically sealed for the purpose of protecting and preserving the battle flags and markers for future generations as the most eloquent testimonials of the patriotism and valor of our fathers. The battle flags and markers shall not be removed from the cases for any purpose other than for their necessary repair or preservation. The department of administration shall have full care, custody, and control of all the battle flags and markers, and the department is hereby authorized and directed to carry out and enforce the provisions and purposes of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department of administration is authorized to remove, conserve, and indefinitely store any battle flag or marker it deems to be in such a state of deterioration that its removal from the State House encasements is necessary for its continued existence.

The department of administration is directed to study the condition of the State House historic battle flags and markers, the encasements in which they are housed and their method of display to ensure their continued survival while permitting, to the extent possible, continued public display of these historic artifacts. In conducting such study, the department shall seek input and guidance from persons with expertise in historic preservation, textile conservation, veterans’ affairs and military history, as well as from members of the public. The department shall prepare a comprehensive set of recommendations for the conservation and display of these battle flags and markers. The department shall present its findings and recommendations to the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate not later than January 1, 2017.

The department is authorized to apply for and accept public or private funds to carry out this study and for the continued preservation and display of these battle flags and markers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1461, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 35, §§ 4, 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 105, §§ 4, 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-8

; P.L. 2015, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 281, § 1.

37-8-9.
Governors’ portraits.

The secretary of state shall cause a portrait to be painted of each governor of the state as soon after the governor is inducted into office and also a portrait of any former governor of the state who may be living and whose portrait is not hung in the state house. Whenever any portrait is finished, the secretary of state shall deliver the portrait to the department of administration to be hung in the State House and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her order upon the general treasurer for a sum sufficient to pay for any portrait out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated upon receipt of vouchers approved by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 363, § 43; P.L. 1921, ch. 2076, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 416, § 45; G.L. 1938, ch. 632, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660 § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-9

.

37-8-10.
Hours State House open — Maintenance of good order.

The department of administration shall fix the hours for opening and closing the State House, but the hours so fixed shall not prevent access by the public to the offices therein during the time when it is provided by law that they shall be kept open. It shall be the duty of the department to maintain good order in the State House and upon the grounds surrounding the State House. The capitol police, the bureau of police and fire of the city of Providence, and the superintendent of state police shall assign such number of officers for that purpose as the department may from time to time request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 1051, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 37, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 35, § 6; P.L. 1931, ch. 1719, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 105, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-10

; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 7.

37-8-11.
Operation of state house restaurant — Sales stands.

The department may make such arrangements as it deems advisable for the operation of the restaurant in the State House. It may lease the restaurant and may regulate the sale of newspapers and other articles within the building. All money received by it from these or any other sources shall be paid to the general treasurer monthly.

All positions in the State House restaurant shall be in the classified service of the state. Employees of the restaurant on June 13, 1963, shall be granted permanent status in classified positions as determined by the personnel administrator. Notwithstanding any prior contractual bases of employment supported by the state house restaurant rotary fund, the employees are herewith specifically granted the longevity increases of employees in the classified service from the date of their original employment in the restaurant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 1051, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 37, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 35, § 7; P.L. 1931, ch. 1719, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 105, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-11

; P.L. 1963, ch. 214, § 1.

37-8-11.1.
Retirement of State House restaurant employees.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the provisions of chapters 8, 9, and 10 of title 36, as amended, shall apply to the employees of the State House restaurant. Any employee shall also be permitted to purchase previous service credits in the retirement system for any periods of employment in the State House restaurant from August 1945, to the present, provided he or she makes written application to the retirement board on or before December 31, 1963, and pays into the retirement system in a lump sum payment the contributions of five percent (5%) of his or her total earnings for the period in which he or she seeks membership credit, plus interest at the rate of four percent (4%) per annum compounded annually up to July 1, 1947, and regular interest of two percent (2%) per annum compounded annually thereafter to date of payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 214, § 2.

37-8-12.
Illumination of State House.

The department is hereby authorized and directed to maintain flood lights on the State House, so arranged as to illuminate the dome, which shall be illuminated nightly. The department is further authorized, in its discretion, to install other flood lights so arranged as to illuminate such other parts of the exterior of the building as it may determine, the lights to be used at such times as the department may deem fit and proper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 35, § 10; P.L. 1931, ch. 1719, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 105, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-12

.

37-8-13.
Offices of department — Annual report.

The department shall have an office in the State House or in the state office building, and shall annually in the month of January make a report to the general assembly of its doings for the preceding calendar year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 1051, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 37, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 35, § 8; P.L. 1931, ch. 1719, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 105, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

37-8-13

.

37-8-14.
Legislators’ parking lot.

The department of administration shall provide suitable parking facilities for all legislators, whereby each member of the legislature shall be assigned a parking area. The department shall appoint a member of the capitol police to be on duty in the legislative parking lot, during all sessions of the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 131, § 1.

37-8-15.
Access for people with disabilities.

The design of all public buildings to be constructed, leased, or rented by the state or any municipality of the state must be in compliance with all the standards promulgated by the Rhode Island State Building Code, chapter 27.3 of title 23, which make buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by people with disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1964, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 95, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 13.

37-8-15.1.
Accessibility of leased or rented facilities for people with disabilities.

No governmental body or public agency, as defined in §

37-2-7

, acting as lessee, shall lease or rent facilities that are not accessible to and usable by individuals with disabilities. The lessee governmental body or public agency shall provide the state building commissioner with a list of prospective facilities to be leased and shall ensure that accessibility certifications in subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), or (a)(3) and (a)(4) of this section are completed prior to submission of the lease or renewal of the lease for final approval by the state properties commission or other authorized body. Prior to a governmental body or public agency leasing or renting any facility, or renewing a lease:

The state building commissioner shall certify that the new facility to be leased or rented conforms to the accessibility for people with disabilities provisions of the state building code; or that the existing facility to be leased or rented meets the accessibility requirements of the state building code in effect at the time of first occupancy after January 1, 1978; or if constructed prior to January 1, 1978, meets the requirements of the current state building code; or

The state building commissioner shall certify that construction documents for the proposed facility to be leased or rented conform to the accessibility requirements of the state building code, and the accessibility renovations shall be completed within six (6) months of the signing of the lease; or

The state building code board of appeals grants a waiver from some provisions of the state building code’s accessibility requirements for people with disabilities provisions with respect to state agency leasing the facility; and

The governor’s commission on disabilities shall certify that the lessee agency’s program accessibility plan ensures access to, and use of the facility to be leased or rented for people with disabilities.

The governor’s commission on disabilities shall only certify an accessibility plan that:

Would not operationally serve to deny any individual with a disability access to a service or program operated by the governmental body or public agency;

Would not operationally serve to deny an employee with a disability or job applicant with a disability employment or advancement in that governmental body or public agency;

The state building code board of appeals shall only grant waivers when total compliance with the disability accessibility provisions of the state building code was structurally infeasible.

The state building commissioner shall reinspect all facilities leased or rented under subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3) prior to the date(s) established in the certification or waiver for completion of any renovations required. If the state building commissioner is unable to issue a certification of compliance with the accessibility for people with disabilities provisions of the building code or the variance, then the commissioner shall inform the director of the department of administration that the facility is in noncompliance. The governor’s commission on disabilities shall have the right to periodically review the implementation of the accessibility plan, and inform the director of the department of administration of any noncompliance. Upon submission of said notification of noncompliance, the director of the department of administration shall take steps to ensure compliance or forward a report to the attorney general for legal action to terminate the lease.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 135, § 4; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 13; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 84; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 84; P.L. 2000, ch. 476, § 1.

37-8-16.
Walkie-talkies portable communications for capitol police.

All members of the capitol police who are assigned to the state house shall be supplied and have on their person a portable communications device while on their tour of duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 9, § 7.

37-8-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 79, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1993, ch. 49, § 1, effective June 29, 1993. For present comparable provisions, see §

37-8-19

.

37-8-17.1.
Energy efficient resources.

In addition to the requirements set forth in §

37-8-19

, the director of the department of administration, in consultation with the state energy office, shall establish, maintain, and implement a system of rebate incentives for the installation of energy efficient sources in state owned and leased buildings offered by the various public utilities providing those resources to the state.

Any public building that is owned by the state or any department, office, board, commission, or agency thereof, including state-supported institutions of higher education shall purchase or generate sixteen percent (16%) of their electricity from renewable energy resources by January 1, 2020, in accordance with the following schedule:

By 2010, four and one-half percent (4.5%) of electricity used shall be from renewable energy resources, with an additional one percent (1%) of electricity purchased or generated in each of the following years 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014; and an additional one and one-half percent (1.5%) of electricity purchased or generated in each of the following years 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, and 2019, from renewable energy resources.

On or before June 1, 2009 the office of Energy Resources shall file a report with the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives detailing the progress of the program to include, but not be limited to, suggestions for achieving the stated goals for renewable energy resources.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 142, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 421, § 1.

37-8-17.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 124, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 8, § 1, effective June 30, 2008.

37-8-18.
Department of administration garage.

All fees and charges collected from users of the parking garage located in the department of administration building shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 44, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 111.

37-8-19.
Energy use in public buildings.

The director of the department of administration shall publish and maintain standards and guidelines for energy conservation and energy cost savings in new, renovated, and newly leased public buildings. The standards shall be, at a minimum, in compliance with the Rhode Island State Building Code, chapter 27.3 of title 23 and will exceed and supplement that code where it is determined to be cost effective to do so.

The standards shall address, at a minimum, lighting, heating, ventilation and air conditioning, building envelope, site orientation, use of passive solar energy, use of energy management systems, use of dual fuel burning capabilities, and use of any available financial subsidies or grants for energy conservation. The objective of the standards and guidelines will be to implement cost effective building design, to achieve energy efficiency, and to minimize the overall cost of constructing, renovating, operating, and maintaining public buildings.

All new, renovated, and newly leased public buildings shall be designed in compliance with the standards and guidelines which may be changed and updated periodically by the director.

Architects and engineers hired by the state will be required to comply with these standards and will also be required to meet with the statewide energy conservation officer and state building code commissioner, or their designees, commencing with the design phase to review the standards and guidelines and to determine how to incorporate them into the project design. A written authorization must be obtained from the statewide energy conservation officer before plans and specifications can be approved for a building permit by the building code commissioner.

The official in charge of supervising the design and construction of public buildings at each of the following state agencies shall have the opportunity to comment on all standards, guidelines, and any periodic changes to them before they become finalized by the director:

The university of Rhode Island, Rhode Island college, the department of MHRH, the community college of Rhode Island, the division of central services, the governor’s energy office, and the state building code commission.

“Public building” for the purpose of this section shall mean any building owned by the state of Rhode Island or any building leased by the state of Rhode Island with a term of two (2) years or longer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 49, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 142, § 2.

37-8-20.
Motorcycle designated parking at public buildings.

In order to encourage and/or accommodate motorcycle parking and to assure, whenever possible, that designated parking spaces for motorcycles are provided in parking areas adjacent to, or within sight of, state, city, and town buildings, every state department or state agency and every agency or institution maintained by a Rhode Island city or town is required to prepare a motorcycle parking plan. Provided, however, airports within the state are not required to comply with this requirement.

Motorcycle parking plans shall initially be prepared prior to November 1, 2012, and shall be promptly posted on the applicable website of the state, city, or town. In the event that a new state, city, or town building is constructed, a motorcycle parking plan shall be in effect within thirty (30) days that the building is open to the public.

Each motorcycle parking plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following provisions:

Wherever possible, designated parking spaces for motorcycles shall be provided in parking areas that are adjacent to, or within sight of, state, city, and town buildings;

The number and placement of designated motorcycle parking spaces shall be determined as a result of motorcycle utilization by employees of state, city, and town buildings, and with input from motorcycle owners;

Designated motorcycle parking places must be set aside and made available annually to state employees during the months of April through November, beginning on April 1, 2013; and

Signage designating motorcycle parking spaces shall be in place by April of each year.

Motorcycle parking plans may be revised as situations warrant, but must be reviewed at least once every five (5) years and revised, as necessary.

The unauthorized use of a designated motorcycle parking space will result in a fine against the registered owner of the offending vehicle in the amount of eighty-five dollars ($85.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 201, § 1.